North Dakota, session 69, SB2373.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 53-06.1-01 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. "Alcoholic beverage establishment" means an establishment licensed under chapter
5-02 where alcoholic beverages are sold, and dispensed, by employees of the
establishment and consumed by guests on the premises. The term does not include a
liquor store, gas station, grocery store, or convenience store.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 53-06.1-03 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. A licensed organization or organization that has a permit shall conduct games as
follows:
a. Only one licensed organization or organization that has a permit may conduct
games at an authorized site on a day, except a raffle or a sports pool conducted
under a local permit may be conducted for a special occasion by another
licensed organization or organization that has a permit when one of these
conditions is met:
(1) When the area for the raffle or a sports pool is physically separated from the
area where games are conducted by the regular organization.
Page No. 1 25.1348.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(2) Upon request of the regular organization and with the approval of the
alcoholic beverage establishment, the regular organization's license or
permit is suspended for that specific time of day by the attorney general.
b. Except for a temporary site authorized for fourteen or fewer consecutive days for
not more than two events per quarter or a licensed organization authorized on or
before January 1, 2023, to conduct gaming at more than fifteen sites, a licensed
organization, including a closely related organization, may not have more than
fifteen sites.
c. Games of electronic quick shot bingo, electronic pull tabs, pull tabs,
punchboards, twenty-one, paddlewheels, poker, and sports pools may be
conducted only during the hours when alcoholic beverages may be dispensed
according to applicable regulations of the state, county, or city.
d. Electronic pull tabs must , pull tabs, punchboards, twenty - one, paddlewheels ,
poker, and sports pools may be conducted only within a designated area where
patrons must be twenty - one years of age or older to enter, which is located in an
alcoholic beverage establishment a designated area where patrons must be
twenty-one years of age or older to enteror in a bingo hall that is an authorized
site on January 1, 2025, and is owned by a licensed organization .
d.e. An organization may not permit a person under twenty-one years of age to
directly or indirectly play electronic pull tabs, pull tabs, punchboards, twenty-one,
calcuttas, sports pools, paddlewheels, or poker. An organization may not permit
an individual under eighteen years of age to directly or indirectly play electronic
quick shot bingo. An organization may not permit an individual under eighteen
years of age to directly or indirectly play bingo unless the individual is
accompanied by an adult, bingo is conducted by an organization that has a
permit, or the game's prize structure does not exceed that allowed for a permit.
e.f. An organization may not install more than ten electronic pull tab devices at a site.
f.g. An organization with more than fifteen licensed sites under subdivision b may not
increase its number of sites beyond the number of sites licensed as of January 1,
2023.
Page No. 2 25.1348.03000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
g.h. An organization conducting gaming at an authorized site on January 1, 2023,
may continue to operate gaming, including as provided under subsection 1 of
section 53-06.1-06, at the authorized site regardless of whether the authorized
site is an alcoholic beverage establishment as defined under section 53-06.1-01.
h.i. For a raffle board, an organization permitted to conduct raffles shall sell the
numbered squares on the board for the same price and may sell squares at a site
thirty days before the drawing.
Page No. 3 25.1348.03000